Illinois, session 104th, HB861.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly:  4    Section 5. The Solid Waste Planning and Recycling Act is 5amended by changing Section 1 as follows: 6    (415 ILCS 15/1)  (from Ch. 85, par. 5951)7    Sec. 1. This Act shall be known and and may be cited as the 8Solid Waste Planning and Recycling Act.9(Source: P.A. 85-1198.)